Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-745
Resolution; notice; hearing.

Notice of the time and place, which place shall be in the county where the district is organized, when any such resolution shall be set for consideration before the board of trustees or the administrator, shall be given the same day each week two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the district was organized, which publication shall contain the entire wording of the resolution and be posted in three conspicuous places in the district. The last publication shall not be less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the adoption of any such resolution, at which hearing the owners of the property which might become subject to assessment for the contemplated improvement may appear and make objections to the proposed improvement. Thereupon the resolution may be amended and adopted or adopted as proposed.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 19, p. 203;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 13.